Idaho, session 2026, S1365.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 67-6606, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
67-6606. EXPENDITURES BY NONBUSINESS ENTITY. (1) Any nonbusiness en-
tity that is not a political committee as defined in section 67-6602, Idaho
Code, making expenditures in or directed to voters in the state of Idaho in
an amount exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) in any calendar year for
the purpose of supporting or opposing one (1) or more candidates or measures
shall file a statement with the secretary of state. The statement shall in-
clude:
(a) The name and address of the nonbusiness entity and the name and ad-
dress of its principal officer or directors.
(b) The name and address of each person whose fees, dues, payments
or other consideration paid to such nonbusiness entity during either
of the prior two (2) calendar years has exceeded five hundred dollars
($500) or who has paid or has agreed to pay fees, dues, payments or other
consideration exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) to such entity dur-
ing the current year.
(2) This statement shall be filed within thirty (30) days of when the
one thousand dollar ($1,000) threshold mentioned in subsection (1) of this
section is exceeded.
(3) The provisions of this section shall not apply to a religious or-
ganization for any action taken to support or oppose any measure if the reli-
gious organization's expenditures or contributions in support or opposition
are in an amount less than ten percent (10%) of its total receipts for the
prior calendar year.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.